South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3370.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 1-1-696 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 1-1-696. The English language is and the Gullah language are the official language languages of the State of South Carolina. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----